Massachusetts, session 194th, S3076.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled,
and by the authority of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 26 of Chapter 149 is hereby amended by adding at the end:
For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor or
a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board or which are registered with and approved by the U.S. Department of Labor
and which have graduated at least one (1) apprentice within the last five years. Nothing in this
section requires that the apprenticeship program in which apprentices are enrolled qualify as an
of 5

employee welfare benefit plan under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
(ERISA), 29 U.S.C. §§1001-1461.
Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
Two years after 15%
Section 6 of Chapter 149 A shall be amended by adding a new section:
(f) For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving
an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor
or a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board or which are registered with and approved by the U.S. Department of Labor
and which have graduated at least one (1) apprentice within the last five years. Nothing in this
section requires that the apprenticeship program in which apprentices are enrolled qualify as an
employee welfare benefit plan under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
(ERISA), 29 U.S.C. §§1001-1461.
Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
of 5

Two years after 15%
Chapter 30 Section 39m is hereby amended by adding a new section:
(f) For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving
an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor
or a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board or which are registered with and approved by the U.S. Department of Labor,
and which have graduated at least one (1) apprentice within the last five years. Nothing in this
section requires that the apprenticeship program in which apprentices are enrolled qualify as an
employee welfare benefit plan under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
(ERISA), 29 U.S.C. §§1001-146
Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
Two years after 15%
SECTION 2. (a) There is hereby established a special commission on apprenticeships in
the commonwealth to study, evaluate and make recommendations on the development,
accessibility, quality, funding and utilization of apprentice and pre-apprentice programs across
of 5

all industry sectors; provided, that the commission shall prioritize the following industry sectors:
public works, construction, transportation, infrastructure and emerging industries.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following members: the secretary of labor and
workforce development or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the director of apprentice
standards or a designee; the secretary of economic development or a designee; the secretary of
transportation or a designee; the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or a
designee; the president of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO or a designee; and 5 members to be
appointed by the chair who shall be: 1 representative of a union apprentice program, 1
representative of an open-shop or non-union apprentice program, 1 representative of construction
contractors, 1 representative of a minority-owned business or women-owned business engaged in
an apprenticeable occupation and 1 member with expertise in workforce development or labor
economics.
(c) The commission shall study apprentice and pre-apprentice programs, including, but
not limited to: (i) the adequacy of existing apprentice and pre-apprentice programs to meet
current and projected workforce needs; (ii) barriers to participation for workers, employers and
sponsors; (iii) alignment of apprentice programs with secondary and post-secondary education
pathways; (iv) the feasibility of expanding the department of elementary and secondary
education’s innovation career pathways program to include building and transportation; (v)
funding mechanisms and appropriation strategies to expand and strengthen apprentice programs;
(vi) progress on the phasing in of apprentice ratios pursuant to paragraph (H) of subdivision (2)
of section 44A of chapter 149 of the General Laws; and (vi) statutory or regulatory changes
necessary to improve apprenticeship utilization and outcomes.
of 5

(d) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commission shall file a report of its findings and
any recommendations, including draft legislation, with the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs
of the joint committee on labor and workforce development.
of 5